Utah statutes.
53C-5-101.   Management of range resources.
(1)  The director is responsible for the efficient management of all range
resources on lands under the director's administration, consistent with his
fiduciary duties of financial support to the beneficiaries.
(2)  This management shall be based on sound resource management principles.
